Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.330

Disposition of proceeds of sale—No claim made—No proof of ownership provided.

If, after the expiration of one year from the date of sale, no claim under RCW 16.57.310 is made or no satisfactory proof of ownership is provided under RCW 16.57.320, the money shall be credited to the department to be expended in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2003 c 326 s 40; 1959 c 54 s 33.]